California, session 20252026, SB1123.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11342.548 of the Government Code is amended to read:11342.548. (a) “Major regulation” means any proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation subject to review by the Office of Administrative Law pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 11349) that will have an economic impact on California business enterprises and individuals in an amount exceeding fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), as estimated by the agency.(b) For purposes of estimating the economic impact of adopting, amending, or repealing a regulation, as required by subdivision (a), an agency shall identify and calculate any offsetting benefits, impacts, or savings that might result directly or indirectly from that adoption, amendment, or repeal and factor those benefits, impacts, or savings into its economic impact estimate.